2.foma
define goose g o o s e "+" N "+" P l -> g e e s e;
define foot f o o t "+" N "+" P l -> f e e t;
define man m a n "+" N "+" P l -> m e n;
define woman w o m a n "+" N "+" P l -> w o m e n;
define tooth t o o t h "+" N "+" P l -> t e e t h;
define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s ;
define YReplacement y -> i e || _ "^" s;
define Edelition "^" -> 0;
define grammar  goose .o. foot .o. man .o. woman .o. tooth .o.
      		EInsertion 	  .o.
      		YReplacement      .o.
      		Edelition;

regex grammar;
    
